tables/no-no-g2.ctb
word natur 1345-2345
begword natur 1345-2345
contraction nt
begword unatur 136-1345-2345
word naturligvis 1345-2345-1236
contraction ntv
word ne 2346
endword ne 2346
word nes 2346-234
endword nes 2346-234

word nedenfor 1345-1246
word nedenfra 1345-124
contraction nf
word neppe 1345-1234
contraction np
word nettopp 1345-2345-1234
contraction ntp
word noen 1345-1345
begword noen 1345-1345
contraction nn
word noko 1345-13
contraction nk
word nokon 1345-13-1345
contraction nkn
word nokre 1345-13-12356
contraction nkr
word nødvendigvis 1345-1236-1236
contraction nvv
word nødvendig 1345-1236
begword nødvendig 1345-1236
contraction nv
word unødvendig 136-1345-1236
begword unødvendig 136-1345-1236

# word når 1345

# word og 14											# defined in level 1
# word også												# defined in level 1
# word oss												# defined in level 1
word ovenfor 135-1246
word ovenfra 135-124
contraction of

# word over 1346								  # defined in level 1
word overble 1346-12
contraction xb
word overblir 1346-12-1235
contraction xbr
word overblitt 1346-12-2345
contraction xbt
contraction xbk
word overfra 1346-124
contraction xf
word overgikk 1346-1245-13
contraction xgk
word overgjekk 1346-1245-245-13
contraction xgjk
word overgjorde 1346-1245-245-1456
word overgjort 1346-1245-245-2345
contraction xgjt
word overgjør 1346-1245-245
contraction xgj
word overgang 1346-1245-1245
contraction xgg
word overjeg 1346-245
contraction xj
contraction xkm
word overnatur 1346-1345-2345
contraction xnt
word overnødvendig 1346-1345-1236
contraction xnv
word overpå 1346-1234
contraction xp
word overselv 1346-234-1236
contraction xsv
word overtatt 1346-2345-2345
contraction xtt
contraction xs
begword uover 136-1346

begword overgang 1346-1245-1245
word overfør 1346-246
contraction xø
word overvære 1346-345
contraction xæ
word overvar 1346-3456
word overvært 1346-1236-2345
contraction xvt

word punkt 1234-13-2345
begword punkt 1234-13-2345
endword punkt 1234-13-2345
contraction pkt
endword punkta 1234-13-2345-1
contraction pkta
endword punktas 1234-13-2345-1-234
contraction pktas
endword punktene 1234-13-2345-15-2346
endword punktenes 1234-13-2345-15-2346-234
endword punkter 1234-13-2345-156
endword punkters 1234-13-2345-156-234
endword punktet 1234-13-2345-346
endword punktets 1234-13-2345-346-234
endword punkts 1234-13-2345-234
contraction pkts
# word på 1234						# defined in level 1

word re 12356
endword re 12356
endword res 12356-234

word samme 234-134
contraction sm

word sammen 234-134-126
begword sammen 234-134-126
begword usammen 136-234-134-126

word seg 234-1245
contraction sg
word selv 234-1236
contraction sv
word sin 234-1345
contraction sn
word sitt 234-2345
contraction st
word sjøl 234-245
contraction sj
word sjølv 234-245-1236
begword sjølv 234-245-1236
contraction sjv
begword usjølv 136-234-245-1236

word skal 123456									# level 2 contractions
word skulla 123456-1
word skulle 123456-15
word skullet 123456-346
word snart 234-1235
contraction sr
word spørsmål 234-1234-134
begword spørsmål 234-1234-134
contraction spm
endword spørsmål 234-1234-134
endword spørsmåla 234-1234-134-1
contraction spma
endword spørsmålas 234-1234-134-1-234
contraction spmas
endword spørsmålene 234-1234-134-15-2346
endword spørsmålenes 234-1234-134-15-2346-234
endword spørsmålet 234-1234-134-346
endword spørsmålets 234-1234-134-346-234
endword spørsmåls 234-1234-134-234
contraction spms

word takk 2345-13
word utakk 136-2345-13
contraction utk
begword takkam 2345-1-13-13-1-134 # exception
begword takkon 2345-1-13-13-135-1345 # exception
begword takku 2345-1-13-13-136 # exception
begword takky 2345-1-13-13-13456 # exception
begword takk 2345-13
contraction tk
begword utakk 136-2345-13

word tatt 2345-2345
contraction tt

word te 1256
endword te 1256
endword tes 1256-234

word tilbake 2345-12
begword tilbake 2345-12
contraction tb
word tilfeldig 2345-124-1245
begword tilfeldig 2345-124-1245
contraction tfg

begword tilfell 2345-124
contraction tfe
contraction tfa
word tilgang 2345-1245-1245
begword tilgang 2345-1245-1245
contraction tgg
word underfra 12345-124
contraction qf

word undergikk 12345-1245-13
contraction qgk
word undergjekk 12345-1245-245-13
contraction qgjk
word undergang 12345-1245-1245
begword undergang 12345-1245-1245
contraction qgg
word undertatt 12345-2345-2345
contraction qtt
word utenfor 136-1246
word utenfra 136-124
contraction uf
word vil 1236-123
contraction vl
word ville 1236-123-15
contraction vle
word villet 1236-123-346

word viss 1236-234
begword viss 1236-234
contraction vs
word uviss 136-1236-234
begword uviss 136-1236-234
contraction uvs

word vanske 1236-14
begword vanske 1236-14
contraction vc

word vært 1236-2345
contraction vt
nofor always te/ 1256-34
# ------------------------------------------------------
